Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 45. Mississippi-Louisiana-Alabama Rapid Rail Transit Compact

§ 57-45-1.
Mississippi-Louisiana-Alabama Rapid Rail Transit Compact.

The Governor, on behalf of this state, is hereby authorized to execute a compact in substantially the following form with the States of Louisiana and Alabama; and the Legislature hereby signifies in advance its approval and ratification of such compact, which compact is as follows:

MISSISSIPPI-LOUISIANA-ALABAMA RAPID RAIL TRANSIT COMPACT

ARTICLE I

The purposeof this compact is to study the feasibility of rapid rail transitservice between Mississippi and the States of Louisiana and Alabamaand to establish a joint interstate commission to assist in this effort.

ARTICLE II

This compactshall become effective immediately as to the states ratifying it wheneverthe States of Louisiana, Mississippi and Alabama have ratified it,and Congress has given consent thereto. Any state not mentioned inthis article which is contiguous with any member state may becomea party to this compact, subject to approval by the Legislature ofeach of the member states.

ARTICLE III

The stateswhich are parties to this compact (hereinafter referred to as “partystates”) do hereby establish and create a joint agency whichshall be known as the Mississippi-Louisiana Rapid Rail Transit Commission(hereinafter referred to as the “commission”). The membershipof such commission shall consist of: the Governor of each party state,one (1) representative each from the Mississippi Energy and TransportationBoard, or its successor, and the Office of Aviation and Public Transportationof the Louisiana Department of Transportation and Development, orits successor, five (5) other citizens of each party state, to beappointed by the Governor thereof. The appointive members of the commissionshall serve for terms of four (4) years each. Vacancies on the commissionshall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired portionof the term. The members of the commission shall not be compensatedfor service on the commission, but each of the appointed members shallbe entitled to actual and reasonable expenses incurred in attendingmeetings, or incurred otherwise in the performance of his duties asa member of the commission. The members of the commission shall holdregular quarterly meetings and such special meetings as its businessmay require. They shall choose annually a chairman and vice chairmanfrom among their members, and the chairmanship shall rotate each yearamong the party states in order of their acceptance of this compact.The commission shall adopt rules and regulations for the transactionof its business and a record shall be kept of all its business. Itshall be the duty of the commission to study the feasibility of providinginterstate rapid rail transit service between the party states. Towardthis end, the commission shall have power to hold hearings; to conductstudies and surveys of all problems, benefits and other matters associatedwith such service, and to make reports thereon; to acquire, by gift,grant or otherwise, from local, state, federal or private sourcessuch money or property as may be provided for the proper performanceof their function, and to hold and dispose of same; to cooperate withother public or private groups, whether local, state, regional ornational, having an interest in such service; to formulate and executeplans and policies for emphasizing the purpose of this compact beforethe Congress of the United States and other appropriate officers andagencies of the United States; and to exercise such other powers asmay be appropriate to enable it to accomplish its functions and dutiesand to carry out the purposes of this compact.

ARTICLE IV

Each partystate agrees that its Legislature may, in its discretion, from timeto time make available and pay over to the commission funds for theestablishment and operation of the commission. The contribution ofeach party state shall be in equal amounts, if possible, but nothingin this article shall be construed as binding the Legislature of eitherstate to make an appropriation of a set amount of funds at any particulartime.

ARTICLE V

Nothing inthis compact shall be construed so as to conflict with any existingstatute, or to limit the powers of any party state, or to repeal orprevent legislation, or to affect any existing or future cooperativearrangement or relationship between any federal agency and a partystate.

ARTICLE VI

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each party state until the Legislature or Governor of each or either state takes action to withdraw therefrom. However, any such withdrawal shall not become effective until six (6) months after the date of the action taken by the Legislature or Governor. Notice of such action shall be given to the other party state or states by the Secretary of State of the party state which takes such action.

There is hereby granted to the Governor, to the members of the commission for Louisiana, and to the compact administrator all the powers provided for in the compact and in this section. All officers of the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized and directed to do all things falling within their respective jurisdictions which are necessary or incidental to carrying out the purpose of the compact.

Pursuant to Article II of this compact, the Legislature of the State of Mississippi hereby assents to the State of Alabama becoming a party to such compact, subject to ratification by the State of Alabama of the terms and provisions thereof.

Pursuant to Article III of this compact, in the exercise of such other powers as may be appropriate to enable the commission to accomplish its functions and duties and to carry out the purposes of this compact, the name of the commission shall be changed to the Southern High-Speed Rail Commission, subject to ratification by the States of Alabama and Louisiana.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 311; Laws, 2009, ch. 497, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2009.